Washington statutes.
RCW 11.130.340

Guardian's plan.

(1) A guardian for an adult, not later than ninety days after appointment, shall file with the court a plan for the care of the adult and shall provide a copy of the plan to the adult subject to guardianship and any other notice party. The plan must be based on the needs of the adult and take into account the best interest of the adult as well as the adult's preferences, values, and prior directions, to the extent known to or reasonably ascertainable by the guardian. The guardian shall include in the plan:

(a) The living arrangement, services, and supports the guardian expects to arrange, facilitate, or continue for the adult;

(b) Social and educational activities the guardian expects to facilitate on behalf of the adult;

(c) Any person with whom the adult has a close personal relationship or relationship involving regular visitation and any plan the guardian has for facilitating visits with the person;

(d) The anticipated nature and frequency of the guardian's visits and communication with the adult;

(e) Goals for the adult, including any goal related to the restoration of the adult's rights, and how the guardian anticipates achieving the goals;

(f) Whether the adult has an existing plan and, if so, whether the guardian's plan is consistent with the adult's plan; and

(g) A statement or list of the amount the guardian proposes to charge for each service the guardian anticipates providing to the adult.

(2) A guardian shall give notice of the filing of the guardian's plan under subsection (1) of this section, together with a copy of the plan, to the adult subject to guardianship and any other notice party. The notice must include a statement of the right to object to the plan and be given not later than fourteen days after the filing.

(3) An adult subject to guardianship and any person entitled under subsection (2) of this section to receive notice and a copy of the guardian's plan may object to the plan.

(4) The court shall review the guardian's plan filed under subsection (1) of this section and determine whether to approve the plan or require a new plan. In deciding whether to approve the plan, the court shall consider an objection under subsection (3) of this section and whether the plan is consistent with the guardian's duties and powers under RCW 11.130.325 and 11.130.330. The court may not approve the plan until thirty days after its filing.

(5) After the guardian's plan filed under this section is approved by the court, the guardian shall provide a copy of the order approving the plan to the adult subject to guardianship and any other notice party.

[ 2020 c 312 s 207; 2019 c 437 s 317.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2020 c 312: See note following RCW 11.130.915.